Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4409
Notice; required.

Any application form for insurance from a risk retention group and any policy issued by a risk retention group shall contain, in ten-point type on the front page and the declaration page, the following notice:

NOTICE

THIS POLICY IS ISSUED BY YOUR RISK RETENTION GROUP. YOUR RISK RETENTION GROUP MAY NOT BE SUBJECT TO ALL OF THE INSURANCE LAWS AND REGULATIONS OF YOUR STATE. STATE INSURANCE INSOLVENCY GUARANTY FUNDS ARE NOT AVAILABLE FOR YOUR RISK RETENTION GROUP.

Laws 1987, LB 514, § 9;

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 51.